District of Columbia statutes.
50-203

EPA Miles Per Gallon requirement; restrictions on use of sport utility vehicles.

(a)

Except for security, emergency, rescue, or armored vehicles, all passenger automobiles, as defined in the Automobile Fuel Efficiency Act of 1980, approved October 10, 1980 (94 Stat. 1824; 15 U.S.C. § 2001(2)), purchased or leased by the District government shall have an Environmental Protection Agency estimated miles per gallon average of not less than 22 miles per gallon, and shall not be a sports utility vehicle.

(b)

The District of Columbia government shall not purchase sport utility vehicles for government use; provided that this section shall not apply to security, emergency rescue, snow removal or armored vehicles.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3402, 47 DCR 6308
Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-231, § 2, 49 DCR 9762
June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 17, 50 DCR 1092
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 3, 51 DCR 881

Section 17 of D.C. Law 14-310 added section 2a to D.C. Law 14-231 to read as follows:

“Sec. 2a. This act [D.C. Law 14-231] shall apply as of October 1, 2004.”

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3402 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
D.C. Law 15-105, substituted “emergency, rescue” for “emergency rescue”.
D.C. Law 14-310 made no changes in the text, but made the amendments by D.C. Law 14-231 applicable prospectively to October 1, 2004.
D.C. Law 14-231 rewrote the section heading which formerly read: “EPA Miles Per Gallon Requirement”; redesignated the text as subsection (a); in the newly designated subsec. (a), inserted “, and shall not be a sports utility vehicle” before the period; and added subsec. (b).